North Dakota, session 69, SB2256.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 54-17 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Research technology park grant program - North Dakota state university - Report.
1. The industrial commission shall administer the research technology park grant program.
Subject to legislative appropriations, the industrial commission shall distribute grant funding to
the research technology park at North Dakota state university. The research technology park
shall use the funds in accordance with this section.
2. The research technology park at North Dakota state university is created to conduct
exploratory, transformational, and innovative research and product development activities that
advance intelligent autonomous mobile equipment opportunities and benefit the state's
economy and environment through:
a. Exploratory research and development of technologies and methodologies that facilitate
the prudent development and efficient use of the state's autonomous agriculture
resources and defense capabilities;
b. Access to advanced robotics and artificial intelligence expertise for timely scientific and
engineering activities to support the state's interests; and
c. Education and outreach related to the state's advanced technology resources, including
the advancement of engineering and technical readiness.
3. Each biennium, the research technology park shall develop a plan for the use of funds
received under this section, including industry matching requirements. The plan must be
approved by the industrial commission.
4. The research technology park may:
a. Select research topics and projects;
b. Enter contracts or agreements with other institutions of higher education to support the
selected research topics and projects;
c. Enter contracts or agreements with federal, private, and nonprofit organizations to carry
out the selected research topics and projects; and
d. Accept donations, grants, contributions, and gifts from any source to finance the selected
research topics and projects.
5. Annually, the research technology park shall report all research activities, product
development, and accomplishments to the industrial commission and the legislative

S. B. NO. 2256 - PAGE 2
management. Upon request, the research technology park shall report to the appropriations
committees of the legislative assembly on the use of funding under this section.
SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - INDUSTRIAL COMMISSION - STRATEGIC INVESTMENT AND
IMPROVEMENTS FUND - RESEARCH TECHNOLOGY PARK GRANT PROGRAM - ONE-TIME
FUNDING. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the strategic investment and improvements fund
in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $10,000,000, or so much of the sum as
may be necessary, to the industrial commission for the purpose of providing grants under the research
technology park grant program pursuant to section 1 of this Act, during the biennium beginning July 1,
2025, and ending June 30, 2027. Of the $10,000,000, the industrial commission shall distribute a grant
of $5,000,000 to the research technology park without a matching requirement and may distribute a
grant of up to $5,000,000 to the research technology park only to the extent the research technology
park provides one dollar of matching funds from nonstate sources for each dollar of grant funding
distributed under the program. The appropriation in this section is considered a one-time funding item.

S. B. NO. 2256 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2256.
Senate Vote: Yeas 31 Nays 15 Absent 1
House Vote: Yeas 61 Nays 30 Absent 3
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State